Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1524XS (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. 536 Section 1. OFFICE OF LONG-TERM CARE OMBUDSMAN ââ 1 APPROPRIATION. 2 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 3 to the office of long-term care ombudsman for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 To increase the number of local long-term care ombudsmen, 8 including for salaries, support, administration, maintenance, 9 and miscellaneous purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 11 2. a. The funding appropriated in this section is in 12 addition to any other funds appropriated from the general fund 13 of the state and any other full-time equivalent positions 14 authorized for local long-term care ombudsmen during the same 15 fiscal year. The funding shall be used to support local 16 ombudsmen in fulfilling their duties pursuant to section 231.42 17 including to provide the resources necessary to complete site 18 visits and to carry out other duties to protect and improve the 19 health, safety, welfare, and rights of residents and tenants. 20 b. To the extent possible, the office of long-term care 21 ombudsman shall use the additional funding to prioritize site 22 visits to nursing facilities that have changed ownership in the 23 immediately preceding consecutive twelve months, especially 24 nursing facilities that have transitioned to private equity 25 ownership. 26